Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2255
Interlocal agreement;
costs; requirements.

Any interlocal agreement authorized
by subdivision (16) of section 29-2252 shall require the political subdivision
party to the agreement to provide sufficient resources to cover all costs
associated with the participation of probation personnel or use of probation
resources other than costs covered by funds provided pursuant to section 29-2262.07
or substance abuse treatment costs covered by funds appropriated for
such purpose.

Laws 2005, LB 538, § 6;

Laws 2011, LB390, § 2.